Missouri, session 2026, SB1576.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 620, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 620.4100, to read as
follows:
620.4100. 1. There is hereby established in the
department of economic development the "Missouri Ireland
Trade Commission", which shall be composed of the following
nine members:
(1) Three members of the senate, appointed by the
president pro tempore of the senate, who shall have
knowledge of, or current or past involvement in,
organizations that promote Irish affairs, or have interest
in the well-being of trade relations between this state and
Ireland;
(2) Three members of the house of representatives,
appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives,
who have knowledge of, or current or past involvement in,
organizations that promote Irish affairs, or have interest
in the well-being of trade relations between this state and
Ireland; and

SB 1576 2
(3) Three members appointed by the governor, with the
advice and consent of the senate, who shall include the
following:
(a) One member who represents a public institution of
higher education in this state;
(b) One member who represents a statewide organization
that advances business interests in this state; and
(c) One member who represents Irish-American
communities or interest in this state.
2. The commission shall study potential means of
advancing the following:
(1) Bilateral trade and investment between this state
and Ireland;
(2) Policy issues of mutual interest to this state and
Ireland;
(3) Business and academic exchanges between this state
and Ireland;
(4) Mutual economic support between this state and
Ireland;
(5) Mutual investment in the infrastructure of this
state and Ireland; and
(6) Any other issues as determined by the commission.
3. Members of the commission shall be appointed not
later than ninety days after the effective date of this
section. Members of the commission appointed from the
general assembly shall serve terms of two years or for the
remainder of the member's term, whichever is less. Members
of the commission appointed by the governor shall serve
terms of four years. Any vacancy on the commission shall be
filled in the same manner as the original appointment.
4. Members of the commission shall serve without
compensation but may be reimbursed for expenses actually

SB 1576 3
incurred in the performance of their duties, within the
limits of funds available to the commission for such
purposes.
5. The commission shall meet and hold hearings at the
places it designates throughout the state. The commission
shall elect a chairperson from among the members of the
commission. The chairperson may appoint from the commission
members of subcommittees and subcommittee chairpersons at
the chairperson's discretion. A majority of the members of
the commission shall constitute a quorum for the transaction
of the business of the commission.
6. Not later than fifteen months after the effective
date of this section, and annually thereafter, the
commission shall issue a report of its activities during the
preceding year and any associated findings and
recommendations to the governor, the president pro tempore
of the senate, and the speaker of the house of
representatives.
7. The commission may raise funds through direct
solicitation or other fundraising events alone, or with
other groups, and accept gifts, grants, and bequests from
individuals, corporations, foundations, governmental
agencies, and public and private organizations and
institutions. The funds, gifts, grants, or bequests
received pursuant to this section shall be deposited to the
"Missouri Ireland Trade Commission Fund", which is hereby
created in the state treasury. The state treasurer shall be
custodian of the fund. In accordance with sections 30.170
and 30.180, the state treasurer may approve disbursements.
Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080 to the
contrary, any moneys remaining in the fund at the end of the
biennium shall not revert to the credit of the general

SB 1576 4
revenue fund. The state treasurer shall invest moneys in
the fund in the same manner as other funds are invested.
Any interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be
credited to the fund. The commission shall use the fund to
defray the commission's administrative expenses and to carry
out its purposes as provided in this section.
✓